Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 1. Generally

§ 35-4-201.
Department of health to cooperate with municipal authorities, corporations and persons as to water, drainage and sewage; definitions of “drainage” and “sewage”.

The department shall consult with and advise the authorities of cities and towns and persons having or about to have systems of water supply, drainage and sewage as to the most appropriate source of water supply and the best method assuring its purity or as to the best method of disposing of their drainage or sewage with reference to the existing and future needs of other cities, towns or persons which may be affected thereby. It shall also consult with and advise all corporations, companies or persons engaged or intending to engage in any manufacturing or other business whose drainage or sewage may tend to pollute any inland water as to the best method of preventing such pollution, and it may conduct experiments to determine the best methods of the purification or disposal of drainage or sewage. Cities, towns and all other corporations, companies or persons shall submit to the department for its advice and approval their proposed system of water supply or of the disposal of drainage or sewage, and no city, town or persons or company shall proceed to build or install or enlarge or extend any system of water supply, drainage or sewage disposal, without first obtaining the approval of the state department of health. In this section the term “drainage” means rainfall, surface and subsoil water only, and “sewage” means domestic and industrial filth and waste.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 92, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 103-247; C.S. 1945, § 64-204; W.S. 1957, § 35-187; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision relating to construction or improvement of works for conservation or utilization of water, see art. 16, § 10, Wyo. Const.

For provisions concerning drainage districts, see §§

41-9-101

to

41-9-606

.

For Water and Sewer District Law, see §§

41-10-101

to

41-10-157

.

As to storage of water for industrial and municipal uses, see §§

41-14-101

to

41-14-103

.

§ 35-4-202.
Contamination of streams by sawmills, mining operations, or other manufacturing or industrial works prohibited; penalty; exceptions; special permits.

Any owner or owners of any sawmill, reduction works, smelter, milling, refining or concentration works, or other manufacturing or industrial works, or any agent, servant or employee thereof, or any person or persons whomsoever, who shall throw or deposit in, or in any way permit to pass into any natural stream or lake within the state, wherein are living fish, any sawdust, chemicals, mill-tailing, or other refuse matter of deleterious substance or poisons of any kind or character whatsoever, that will or may tend to the destruction or driving away from such waters any fish, or kill or destroy any fish therein, or that will or may tend to pollute, contaminate, render impure or unfit for domestic, irrigation, stock or other purposes for which appropriated and used, the waters of any such natural streams or lake, or that will or may tend to obstruct, fill in or otherwise interfere with the flow, channel or condition of such streams, lake or waters, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) or more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or shall be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment for each offense; and where any of the foregoing unlawful acts are committed continuously, each of the days upon which committed shall be treated and considered as a separate and distinct offense; provided, that nothing in this section or W.S.

23-3-204

shall apply to the slag from smelter furnaces; provided further, that nothing in this section nor in any of the other laws of this state shall prevent the owner or owners of any mill, concentration works, reduction works or tailings pond or basin used in connection therewith, in this state, now or hereafter to be located upon any natural stream, or lake, from operating said mill, concentration works, reduction works or tailings pond or basin used in connection therewith, where the said owner or owners thereof shall build or cause to be built a dam or dams for settling purposes; provided however that before any dam or dams shall be built for any such purposes, the director of the state department of health, the director of the state game and fish department and the state engineer, acting as a joint committee and each member casting a vote of his department, shall review such plans and according to their findings shall approve or disapprove such plans for preventing any deleterious substances from entering any waters beyond the project area; provided, that whenever a majority of the landowners on any irrigation stream shall petition the director of the state game and fish department to allow sawdust to be put in any stream that does not reach a main body of water or living stream he shall have the power to grant such permits.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 83, § 98; R.S. 1931, § 49-200; C.S. 1945, § 47-507; Laws 1957, ch. 82, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-196; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2012, ch. 84, § 103.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “director of the state game and fish department” for “state game and fish commissioner” throughout the section.

Editor's notes. —

The game and fish commissioner has been replaced by the director of the game and fish department. See §§

23-1-401

to

23-1-405

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability, under § 311(i) of Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 USC § 1321(i)), of United States to owner or operator of onshore or offshore facility, or vessel, for removal costs of oil or hazardous substance, 59 ALR Fed 282.